North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-06.1 Civil Air Patrol Members

65-06.1-01.
Civil air patrol member defined.

“Civil air patrol member” means a volunteer civilian member of the civil air patrol engaged in official state activities authorized under chapter 54-45.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 29, § 5; 1991, ch. 613, § 3.

65-06.1-02.
Civil air patrol members declared employees — Covered by workforce safety and insurance.

Civil air patrol members are deemed employees of the civil air patrol and eligible for coverage under this title when engaged in official state activities authorized under chapter 54-45.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 29, § 5; 1991, ch. 613, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-06.1-03.
Compensation benefits — How determined.

The basis for compensation and benefits for civil air patrol members under this chapter shall be determined under section 65-05-09, except that the claimant’s weekly wage shall be determined through computation of income derived from the claimant’s business or employment.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 29, § 5.

65-06.1-04.
Reimbursement for liability in excess of collected premiums.

Whenever claim liability against the fund credited to the classification of civil air patrol members exceeds the amount of premiums paid into the fund, the excess liabilities are a general obligation of the state of North Dakota and must be reimbursed to the organization for credit to the workforce safety and insurance fund through legislative appropriation. The adjutant general may use the funds available to the adjutant general under the Federal Employment Compensation Act liability coverage to satisfy the obligation under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 29, § 5; 1991, ch. 714, § 64; 1997, ch. 26, § 5; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.